Maine, session 132, LD1881.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4017 is enacted to read:
§4017. Parental rights with regard to education
1. Right to access information. A parent is entitled to access all information
regarding the school activities of the parent's minor child. A parent is entitled to review all
information regarding mental, emotional and physical health care services available at the
school the parent's minor child attends as well as all teaching and instructional materials
for the parent's minor child, including materials used while that child is participating in
virtual or remote learning. A parent is entitled to receive a well-being questionnaire or
health screening form before that questionnaire or form is administered to the minor child.
Notwithstanding Title 22, section 1908, a parent is entitled to access health care and
educational records of the parent's minor child. A parent is entitled to the information in
this subsection in a reasonably accessible manner.
2. Right to deny participation. A parent is entitled to refuse the parent's minor child’s
participation in a noneducational or core assignment, activity or service or assignment of
material and to request an alternative assignment, activity or service or material.
3. Prohibition regarding procedures or forms. The governing body of a school
administrative unit may not adopt procedures or student support forms that:
A. Prohibit school administrative unit personnel from notifying a parent of a student
about that student's mental, emotional or physical health or well-being; or
B. Encourage or have the effect of encouraging a student to withhold from the student's
parent information described in paragraph A.
4. Prohibition regarding personnel. School administrative unit personnel may not
discourage or prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical decisions
affecting a student's educational learning or mental, emotional or physical health or well-
being.
5. Exception. This section does not prohibit a school administrative unit from
adopting procedures that permit school administrative unit personnel to withhold
information from a parent if a reasonably prudent person would believe that disclosure
would result in abuse or neglect as defined in Title 22, section 4002, subsection 1 or
abandonment as defined in Title 22, section 4002, subsection 1-A.